California statutes. Education Code
(c) As to any such employee who is reappointed, the period of his absence shall be treated as a leave of absence and shall not be considered as a break in the continuity of his service, he shall retain the classification and order of employment he had when his services were terminated, and credit for prior service under any state or district retirement system shall not be affected by such termination; provided, however, that the period of his absence shall not be counted as a part of the service required for attaining permanent status in the district or, except as provided in subdivision (e), for retirement purposes.

(d) During the period of his preferred right to reappointment, any such employee shall, in the order of original employment, and subject to the rights of permanent employees as set forth in Section 44956, be offered prior opportunity for substitute service during the absence of any other employee who has been granted leave of absence or who is temporarily absent from duty; provided, that his services may be terminated upon a return to duty of such other employee, that such substitute service shall not affect the retention of his previous classification and rights, and that such an employee shall be given a priority over employees whose right to a substitute position is derived pursuant to Section 44918.

(e) At any time prior to the completion of one year after his return to service, an employee reappointed under the provisions of this section may elect to continue or to reinstate his membership and interest in any state or district retirement system and to receive retirement benefits as if no absence from service had occurred. In the event of such election the employee shall pay into the retirement system the amount of his share of contribution and the district’s share of contribution attributable to the period of absence and the amount of any contributions withdrawn, plus interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1302, Sec. 15.5.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44958.

If the services of any probationary employee are terminated, or if such employee is dismissed, because of a reduction in the attendance of pupils or the discontinuance of a particular kind of service, and such employee is reemployed within a period of 39 months from the last day of the school year within which his service was so terminated, or within 39 months after the cessation of hostilities, if such reduction in attendance or discontinuance of service was due to war conditions, the period of his absence shall not count as a part of the service required as a condition precedent to the classification of such employee as a permanent employee of the district, but such absence shall not be construed as a break in the continuity of the service of such employee.

Every such probationary employee who has been reemployed as indicated in this section shall have all of the rights enumerated in Sections 44955 to 44961, inclusive, for permanent employees, except the right of reappointment, subject only to the prior rights of permanent employees.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any probationary employee who shall be or who shall have been dismissed or terminated after January 1, 1949, because of reduction in attendance or discontinuance of a particular kind of service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44959.

As to any permanent certificated employee whose services have been terminated because of the effect of wars in which the United States is engaged upon the attendance of pupils or upon the maintenance of a particular kind of service, the effective period covered by all rights enumerated in Section 44956 is extended until two years after the cessation of hostilities, and in addition thereto for a like period these employees shall have the following rights:

(a) He or she may voluntarily accept termination of service in other than the order of original employment and retain all of the other rights herein provided.

(b) If he or she is engaged in any form of civilian or military war service, any credential or certificate he or she holds is continued in full force and effect until 90 days after the termination of his or her employment therein.

(c) If, either before or after such termination, he or she engages in any form of war service for which provision is made in Section 44800 or elsewhere in the laws of this state, he or she shall retain all rights granted by that war service legislation as though still employed. However, the right to reappointment shall be in the order of original employment, as determined in accordance with the provisions of Sections 44844 and 44845.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44959.5.

(a) The layoff provisions of Sections 44955, 44956, 44957, 44958, and 44959 shall not be applicable to probationary certificated employees who are covered by a collective agreement which contains provisions for the layoff and reassignment of such employees.

(b) If layoff proceedings are commenced under procedures prescribed by any of the sections referred to in subdivision (a), such proceedings shall continue in accordance with the statutory procedures, notwithstanding the subsequent adoption of a collective agreement or the inclusion in the coverage thereof of employees not so covered at the time such proceedings commenced.

(c) If layoff proceedings are commenced under a collective agreement which contains provisions for the layoff of probationary certificated employees, such proceedings shall continue in accordance with the agreement, notwithstanding the subsequent termination of the agreement.

(d) This section shall only apply to a school district in which the average daily attendance is 250,000 or more and shall not be interpreted to apply to the termination of any probationary certificated employee pursuant to Section 44948 or 44949.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 7.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44960.

The services of any permanent certificated employee referred to in Section 44959 who has been appointed to substitute service in place of another employee who is on leave of absence for civilian or military war service may be terminated upon the return of said other employee from such leave of absence, but only at the end of the current semester or quarter and not less than 30 days after written notice that his services will no longer be required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44961.

In specifying or defining the rights of employees in Sections 44955 to 44961, inclusive, the effect of war refers to “war” as defined in Section 22804.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 303, Sec. 10.   (SB 509)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44962.

Governing boards of school districts may grant leaves of absence to persons employed in positions requiring certification qualifications.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44963.

When any provision of this code expressly authorizes or requires the governing board of a school district to grant a leave of absence for any purpose or for any period of time to persons employed in positions requiring certification qualifications, that express authorization or requirement does not deprive the governing board of the power to grant leaves of absence with or without pay to such employees for other purposes or for other periods of time, so long as the governing board does not deprive any employee of any leave of absence to which he is entitled by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44964.

The governing board of any school district may provide for the leave of absence from duty and may grant compensation during the leave of absence to any employee of the district who is employed in a position requiring certification qualifications and who is compelled to absent himself from his duties because of accident or illness, whether or not the cause of absence arises out of and in the course of the employment of the employee, or because of quarantine which results from his contact with other persons having a contagious disease while performing his duties, or because of temporary inability to perform the services required of him because of illness, accident, or quarantine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44965.

The governing board of any school district shall provide for leave of absence from duty for any certificated employee of the district who is required to be absent from duties because of pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician.

Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by any school district.

Except as provided herein, written and unwritten employment policies and practices of any school district shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.

This section shall be construed as requiring the governing board of a school district to grant leave with pay only when it is necessary to do so in order that leaves of absence for disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth be treated the same as leaves for illness, injury, or disability.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 78.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 79 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

44965.

(a) (1) A public school employer shall provide for a leave of absence from duty for a certificated employee of the public school employer who is required to be absent from duty because the employee is experiencing or has experienced pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the leave of absence shall be with full pay, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks. The paid leave may begin before and continue after childbirth if the employee is actually disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination
 of pregnancy, or related medical conditions.

(2) For part-time certificated employees, the amount of paid leave per week, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks, shall be calculated in accordance with the following:

(A) If the part-time employee works a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay for the total number of hours the employee is normally scheduled to work for the public school employer.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), if the part-time employee does not work a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the six-month period immediately preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(ii) If the part-time employee has been employed for less than six months, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the entire period of that employment preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a public school employer shall maintain group health coverage for an employee who takes a leave of absence under this section for the duration of the leave of absence at the same level and under the same conditions that coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken a leave of absence.

(4) A leave of absence taken under this section shall not be deducted from any other leaves of absence available to the employee for subsequent injury, illness, or disabilities, including those caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth,
 pursuant to state or federal regulations or laws, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(5) Compensation during the leave of absence taken under this section shall include retirement fund contributions required of the public school employer. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions to the retirement fund.

(b) Disabilities caused or contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions are, for all job-related purposes, temporary disabilities, and shall be treated as such under any health or temporary disability insurance or sick leave plan available in connection with employment by a public school employer.

(c) Except as provided in this section, written and unwritten employment policies and
 practices of a public school employer shall be applied to disability due to pregnancy or childbirth on the same terms and conditions applied to other temporary disabilities.

(d) Except as provided in this section, there are no eligibility requirements, including, but not limited to, minimum hours worked or length of service, before an employee disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions is eligible for a paid leave of absence under this section.

(e) A public school employer that has elected to become an employer subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code pursuant to Section 710.4 of the Unemployment Insurance Code may apply the disability benefits of an employee under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code in partial satisfaction of
 the requirements of this section. Full satisfaction of the requirements of this section is met if the employer ensures that the employee receives the full amount of pay during the leave of absence required by this section without a reduction to the vacation, sick, or other compensated leave time balances of the employee.

(f) This section shall not apply to any employee classified as a substitute or temporary employee.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a public school employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater disability or parental leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.

(h) For purposes of this section, “public school employer” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or educational joint powers authority.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 78) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 79.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

44966.

The governing board of any school district may grant any employee of the district employed in a position requiring certification qualifications, a leave of absence for not to exceed one year for the purpose of permitting study or travel by the employee which will benefit the schools and pupils of the district. The governing board may provide that the leave of absence be taken in separate six-month periods or separate quarters rather than for a continuous one-year period, provided that the leave of absence for both of the separate six-month periods or any or all quarters shall be commenced and completed within a three-year period. Any period of service by the individual intervening between the two separate six-month periods or separate quarters of the leave of absence shall comprise a part of the service required for a subsequent leave of absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44967.

No leave of absence shall be granted to any employee under Section 44966 who has not rendered service to the district for at least seven consecutive years preceding the granting of the leave, and not more than one such leave of absence shall be granted in each seven-year period. The governing board granting the leave of absence may, subject to the rules and regulations of the State Board of Education, prescribe the standards of service which shall entitle the employee to the leave of absence. No absence from the service of the district under a leave of absence, other than a leave of absence granted pursuant to Section 44966, granted by the governing board of the district shall be deemed a break in the continuity of service required by this section, and the period of such absence shall not be included as service in computing the seven consecutive years of service required by this section. Service under a national recognized fellowship or foundation approved by the State Board of Education, for a period of not more than one year, for research, teaching or lecturing shall not be deemed a break in continuity of service, and the period of such absence shall be included in computing the seven consecutive years of service required by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44968.

Every employee granted a leave of absence pursuant to Section 44966 may be required to perform such services during the leave as the governing board of the district and the employee may agree upon in writing, and the employee shall receive such compensation during the period of the leave as the governing board and the employee may agree upon in writing, which compensation shall be not less than the difference between the salary of the employee on leave and the salary of a substitute employee in the position which the employee held prior to the granting of the leave. However, in lieu of such difference, the board may pay one-half of the salary of the employee on leave or any additional amount up to and including the full salary of the employee on leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44968.5.

An employee granted a leave of absence pursuant to Section 44966 or 44967 may agree in writing with the governing board of the school district not to receive compensation during the period of the leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44969.

Every employee, as a condition to being granted a leave of absence pursuant to Section 44966, shall agree in writing to render a period of service in the employ of the governing board of the district following his return from the leave of absence which is equal to twice the period of the leave. Compensation granted by the governing board to the employee on leave for less than one year may be paid during the first year of service rendered in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence or, in the event that the leave is for a period of one year, such compensation may be paid in two equal annual installments during the first two years of such service following the return of the employee. The compensation shall be paid the employee while on the leave of absence in the same manner as if the employee were teaching in the district, upon the furnishing by the employee of a suitable bond indemnifying the governing board of the district against loss in the event that the employee fails to render the agreed upon period of service in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence. The bond shall be exonerated in event the failure of the employee to return and render the agreed upon period of service is caused by the death or physical or mental disability of the employee. If the governing board finds and by resolution declares that the interests of the district will be protected by the written agreement of the employee to return to the service of the district and render the agreed upon period of service therein following his return from the leave, the governing board in its discretion may waive the furnishing of the bond and pay the employee on leave in the same manner as though a bond is furnished.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44970.

If the employee does not serve for the entire period of service agreed upon under Section 44969, the amount of compensation paid for the leave of absence shall be reduced by an amount which bears the same proportion to the total compensation as the amount of time which was not served bears to the total amount of time agreed upon. If the employee furnished an indemnity bond, upon default, the proceeds of the bond shall be divided between the employee and the school district in the same proportion as the actual amount of time served bears to the amount of time agreed upon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44972.

Where one governing board serves as the governing board of two or more separate districts, an employee may fulfill the service requirements provided in Section 44967 or in 44969, or both, by service in any one or more of the districts under the jurisdiction of such governing board. At the option of the governing board the provisions of this section may apply in whole or in part to service rendered prior to October 1, 1949.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44973.

At the expiration of the leave of absence of the employee, he shall, unless he otherwise agrees, be reinstated in the position held by him at the time of the granting of the leave of absence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44974.

Both the governing board of any district and the district shall be freed from any liability for the payment of any compensation or damages provided by law for the death or injury of any employee of the district employed in a position requiring certification qualifications when the death or injury occurs while the employee is on any leave of absence granted under the provisions of Sections 44962 to 44976, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44975.

No leave of absence when granted to a probationary employee shall be construed as a break in the continuity of service required for the classification of the employee as permanent. The time during which the leave of absence is taken shall not be considered as employment within the meaning of Sections 44882 to 44891, inclusive, Sections 44893 to 44900, inclusive, Sections 44901 to 44906, inclusive, and Sections 44908 to 44919, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44976.

When any school or other place of employment shall have been transferred from one district to another, any certificated employees who transfer with said school or other place of employment shall be entitled to retain all sickness and injury, sabbatical and other leave rights accumulated by service prior to such transfer and the district to which such school or other place of employment has been transferred shall recognize or grant such rights, including any accumulated rights allowed by the governing board of the district from which the school or other place of employment was transferred, as fully as if there had been no change in the district maintaining such school or other place of employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44977.

(a) During each school year, when a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications has exhausted all available sick leave, including all accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent from his or her duties on account of illness or accident for an additional period of five school months, whether or not the absence arises out of or in the course of the employment of the employee, the amount deducted from the salary due him or her for any of the additional five months in which the absence occurs shall not exceed the sum that is actually paid a substitute employee employed to fill his or her position during his or her absence or, if no substitute employee was employed, the amount that would have been paid to the substitute had he or she been employed. The school district shall make every reasonable effort to secure the services of a substitute employee.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a):

(1) The sick leave, including accumulated sick leave, and the five-month period shall run consecutively.

(2) An employee shall not be provided more than one five-month period per illness or accident. However, if a school year terminates before the five-month period is exhausted, the employee may take the balance of the five-month period in a subsequent school year. 

(c) The governing board of every school district shall adopt a salary schedule for substitute employees. The salary schedule shall indicate a salary for a substitute for all categories or classes of certificated employees of the district.

(d) Excepting in a district the governing board of which has adopted a salary schedule for substitute employees of the district, the amount paid the substitute employee during any month shall be less than the salary due the employee absent from his or her duties.

(e) When a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications is absent from his or her duties on account of illness for a period of more than five school months, or when a person is absent from his or her duties for a cause other than illness, the amount deducted from the salary due him or her for the month in which the absence occurs shall be determined according to the rules and regulations established by the governing board of the district. The rules and regulations shall not conflict with rules and regulations of the State Board of Education.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to deprive any district, city, or city and county of the right to make any reasonable rule for the regulation of accident or sick leave or cumulative accident or sick leave without loss of salary for persons acquiring certification qualifications.

(g) This section shall be applicable whether or not the absence from duty is by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of the employing district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 30, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

44977.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, during each school year, a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications may use his or her sick leave for purposes of parental leave for a period of up to 12 workweeks.

(2) In school districts that use the differential pay system described in Section 44977, when a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications has exhausted all available sick leave, including all accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent from his or her duties on account of parental leave pursuant to Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, the amount deducted from the salary due him or her for any of the remaining
 portion of the 12-workweek period in which the absence occurs shall not exceed the sum that is actually paid a substitute employee employed to fill his or her position during his or her absence or, if no substitute employee was employed, the amount that would have been paid to a substitute had he or she been employed. The school district shall make every reasonable effort to secure the services of a substitute employee.

(3) In school districts that use the differential pay system described in Section 44983, when a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications has exhausted all available sick leave, including all accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent from his or her duties on account of parental leave pursuant to Section 12945.2 of the Government Code, the person shall be compensated at no less than
 50 percent of his or her regular salary for the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period of parental leave.

(4) Regardless of the type of differential pay system used by the school district pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3), the compensation a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications shall receive shall be no less than 50 percent of his or her regular salary for the remaining portion of the 12-workweek period of parental leave.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), all of the following apply:

(1) The 12-workweek period shall be reduced by any period of sick leave, including accumulated sick leave, taken during a period of parental leave.

(2) A person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications shall not be provided more than one 12-week period for parental leave during any 12-month period.

(3) Parental leave taken pursuant to this section shall run concurrently with parental leave taken pursuant to Section 12945.2 of the Government Code. The aggregate amount of parental leave taken pursuant to this section and Section 12945.2 of the Government Code shall not exceed 12 workweeks in a 12-month period.

(c) This section shall be applicable whether or not the absence from duty is by reason of a leave of absence granted by the governing board of the employing school district.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 12945.2 of the
 Government Code, a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications is not required to have 1,250 hours of service with the employer during the previous 12-month period in order to take parental leave pursuant to this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a public school employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater parental leave rights to employees than the rights established under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, “parental leave” means leave for reason of the birth
 of a child of the employee, or the placement of a child with an employee in connection with the adoption or foster care of the child by the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 994, Sec. 1.   (AB 2012)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44978.

Every certificated employee employed five days a week by a school district shall be entitled to 10 days’ leave of absence for illness or injury and additional days in addition thereto as the governing board may allow for illness or injury, exclusive of all days he or she is not required to render service to the district, with full pay for a school year of service. A certificated employee employed for less than five schooldays a week shall be entitled, for a school year of service, to that proportion of 10 days’ leave of absence for illness or injury as the number of days he or she is employed per week bears to five and is entitled to additional days in addition thereto as the governing board may allow for illness or injury to certificated employees employed for less than five schooldays a week. Pay for any day of this absence shall be the same as the pay that would have been received had the employee served during the day. Credit for leave of absence need not be accrued prior to taking the leave by the employee and the leave of absence may be taken at any time during the school year. If the employee does not take the full amount of leave allowed in any school year under this section the amount not taken shall be accumulated from year to year with additional days as the governing board may allow.

The governing board of each school district shall adopt rules and regulations requiring and prescribing the manner of proof of illness or injury for the purposes of this section. The rules and regulations shall not discriminate against evidence of treatment and the need therefor by the practice of the religion of any well-recognized church or denomination.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to modify or repeal any provision of law contained in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 120175) of Part 1 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code.

Section 44977 relating to compensation, shall not apply to the first 10 days of absence on account of illness or accident of the employee employed five days a week or to the proportion of 10 days of absence to which the employee employed less than five days a week is entitled hereunder on account of illness or accident or to additional days granted by the governing board. Any employee shall have the right to utilize sick leave provided for in this section and the benefit provided by Section 44977 for absences necessitated by pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, and recovery therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 36.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

44978.1.

When a certificated employee has exhausted all available sick leave, including accumulated sick leave, and continues to be absent on account of illness or accident for a period beyond the five-month period provided pursuant to Section 44977, and the employee is not medically able to resume the duties of his or her position, the employee shall, if not placed in another position, be placed on a reemployment list for a period of 24 months if the employee is on probationary status, or for a period of 39 months if the employee is on permanent status. When the employee is medically able, during the 24- or 39-month period, the certificated employee shall be returned to employment in a position for which he or she is credentialed and qualified. The 24-month or 39-month period shall commence at the expiration of the five-month period provided pursuant to Section 44977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

44978.2.

(a) (1) In addition to any other entitlement for leave of absence for illness or injury with pay, a certificated employee hired on or after, or employed on or after, January 1, 2017, who is a former active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States or a former or current member of the California National Guard or a federal reserve component, with a service-connected disability rated at 30 percent or more by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, shall be entitled to leave of absence for illness or injury with pay of up to 10 days for the purpose of undergoing medical treatment, including mental health treatment, for his or her service-connected disability.

(2) Credit for leave of absence for illness or injury granted
 under this subdivision shall be credited to a qualifying certificated employee on the effective date of the employee’s disability rating decision from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or on the first day the qualifying certificated employee begins, or returns to, employment after active duty, whichever is later, and shall remain available for use for the following 12 months of employment.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), credit for leave of absence for illness or injury granted under this subdivision shall be credited to a certificated employee on the date the employee receives confirmation of submission of his or her disability application to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. When the certificated employee receives his or her disability rating decision from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the employee shall report that information to the employer. If the certificated employee’s disability
 rating decision makes the employee ineligible pursuant to paragraph (1), the employer may change the leave of absence for illness or injury time used before the disability rating decision to an alternative leave balance. If the certificated employee’s disability rating decision makes the employee eligible pursuant to paragraph (1), the employee shall be entitled to 10 days for the purpose of undergoing medical treatment, including mental health treatment, for his or her service-connected disability minus the time used before the disability rating decision, for the 12-month period beginning with the confirmation of submission of his or her disability application.

(4) Leave of absence for illness or injury credited pursuant to this subdivision that is not used during the 12-month period shall not be carried over and shall be forfeited.

(5) Submission of satisfactory proof that a
 leave of absence for illness or injury granted under this subdivision is used for treatment of a service-connected disability may be required pursuant to rules adopted by the governing board of a school district.

(b) A certificated employee, as described in subdivision (a), employed less than five days per week, shall be entitled to that proportion of 10 days’ leave of absence for illness or injury granted pursuant to subdivision (a) as the number of days he or she is employed per week bears to five.

(c) This section shall not be construed to diminish the obligation of a public school employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater leave of absence rights to
 employees than the rights established under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 52.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

44979.

(a) A certificated employee of a school district, county office of education, or state special school who has been an employee of that employing entity for a period of one school year or more and who accepts a position requiring certification qualifications with another school district, county office of education, state special school, or community college district shall have the total number of days of leave of absence for illness or injury that the employee has accumulated with the first employing entity pursuant to
 Section 44978 transferred to the subsequent employing entity. The subsequent employing entity shall honor a transfer request made at any time during the certificated employee’s employment with that school district, community college district, county office of education, or state special school.

(b) The former employing school district, county office of education,